Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.230

Appearance and claim of heirs—Notices to department of revenue.

Upon the appearance of heirs and the establishment of their claim to the satisfaction of the court prior to entry of the decree of distribution to the estate, the provisions of RCW 11.08.140 through 11.08.280 shall not further apply, except for purposes of appeal: PROVIDED, That the department of revenue shall be promptly given written notice of such appearance by the claimants and furnished copies of all papers or documents on which such claim of heirship is based. Any documents in a foreign language shall be accompanied by translations made by a properly qualified translator, certified by him or her to be true and correct translations of the original documents. The administrator or his or her attorney shall also furnish the department of revenue with any other available information bearing on the validity of the claim.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2009; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 7; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.230. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 11.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.